apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
        <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
      <p>
        <l>-vos</l> 
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>-les</l> 
        <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
      <p>
        <l>-vos</l> 
        <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>-les</l> 
        <r>vos<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
      <p>
        <l>-vos</l> 
        <r>li<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="generau__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bèlg/a__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ues</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cont/inu__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ínues</l> 
        <r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ínuas</l> 
        <r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ínua</l> 
        <r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inus</l> 
        <r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inu</l> 
        <r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prop/ici__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ícies</l> 
        <r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ícias</l> 
        <r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ícia</l> 
        <r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>icis</l> 
        <r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ici</l> 
        <r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="agricòl/a__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="barlò/ca__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ques</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cas</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l> 
        <r>ca<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="post__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="content__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>es</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ar/abi__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àbies</l> 
        <r>abi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àbias</l> 
        <r>abi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àbia</l> 
        <r>abi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>abis</l> 
        <r>abi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>abi</l> 
        <r>abi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lè/g__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ges</l> 
        <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jas</l> 
        <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ja</l> 
        <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gi</l> 
        <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ges</l> 
        <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>gs</l> 
        <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>g</l> 
        <r>g<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tranquil__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>les</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>las</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>li</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/avi__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àvies</l> 
        <r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àvias</l> 
        <r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>àvia</l> 
        <r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avis</l> 
        <r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avi</l> 
        <r>avi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nauè/th__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>res</l> 
        <r>th<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ras</l> 
        <r>th<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l> 
        <r>th<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ths</l> 
        <r>th<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>th</l> 
        <r>th<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="anarquista" a="carmentano">
        <i>anarquist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="arabi" a="carmentano">
        <i>ar</i> 
        <par n="ar/abi__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="RL" lm="assistencial" a="carmentano">
        <i>assistencial</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="baug" a=" mmonge">
        <i>bau</i> 
        <par n="lè/g__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="blaugrana">
        <i>blaugran</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="brutau" a="carmentano">
        <i>brutau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bèlga">
        <i>bèlg</i> 
        <par n="bèlg/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="conscient">
        <i>conscient</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="continu" a="mmonge">
        <i>cont</i> 
        <par n="cont/inu__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="corporau">
        <i>corporau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="diferent">
        <i>diferent</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="electoralista" a="carmentano">
        <i>electoralist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="especiau">
        <i>especiau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="estonant" a="carmentano">
        <i>estonant</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fascista" a="carmentano">
        <i>fascist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fiscau">
        <i>fiscau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fondamental">
        <i>fondamental</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="franquista" a="carmentano">
        <i>franquist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="freg">
        <i>fre</i> 
        <par n="lè/g__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="fòrça">
        <i>fòrça</i> 
        <par n="post__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="igual" a="carmentano">
        <i>igual</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="inedit" a="carmentano">
        <i>inedit</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="internacionau">
        <i>internacionau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="islamista" a="carmentano">
        <i>islamist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lag">
        <i>la</i> 
        <par n="lè/g__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="latin" a="carmentano">
        <i>latin</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="lèg">
        <i>lè</i> 
        <par n="lè/g__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="manuau">
        <i>manuau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="mendre">
        <i>mendre</i> 
        <par n="post__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mexican">
        <i>mexican</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mièg">
        <i>miè</i> 
        <par n="lè/g__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mondiau">
        <i>mondiau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="multimèdia" a="mmonge">
        <i>multimèdia</i> 
        <par n="post__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="mèg">
        <i>mè</i> 
        <par n="lè/g__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="nauèth">
        <i>nauè</i> 
        <par n="nauè/th__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nul" a="carmentano">
        <i>nul</i> 
        <par n="tranquil__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="optimista" a="carmentano">
        <i>optimist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="partidista" a=" mmonge">
        <i>partidist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="potenciau">
        <i>potenciau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="predador" a="carmentano">
        <i>predador</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="propici">
        <i>prop</i> 
        <par n="prop/ici__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="racista" a="carmentano">
        <i>racist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="savi">
        <i>s</i> 
        <par n="s/avi__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sobiranista" a="carmentano">
        <i>sobiranist</i> 
        <par n="agricòl/a__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="substanciau">
        <i>substanciau</i> 
        <par n="generau__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="temporal">
        <i>temporal</i> 
        <par n="content__adj"/> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tranquil">
        <i>tranquil</i> 
        <par n="tranquil__adj"/> 
    </e>
